District of Columbia statutes.
47-306

Submission and approval of gross planning budget.

Pursuant to §§ 1-204.48(a)(3) and 1-206.03(c) and (d), the Mayor shall annually, and prior to transmittal of the budget of the District to the President of the United States, submit to the Council a gross planning budget for the District, which shall include, but not be limited to, the amount of estimated revenue by source, including all sources, and the planned obligation of all revenue presented at responsibility center detail. The gross planning budget shall be approved by resolution of the Council.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-104, § 7, 27 DCR 3748
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-306.